Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Sewage Disposal.

§ 32.1-163.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Alternative discharging sewage system”
means any device or system which results in a point source discharge of treated sewage for which the Board may issue a permit authorizing construction and operation when such system is regulated by the State Water Control Board pursuant to a general Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit issued for an individual single family dwelling with flows less than or equal to 1,000 gallons per day.

“Alternative onsite sewage system”
or

“alternative onsite system”

means a treatment works that is not a conventional onsite sewage system and does not result in a point source discharge.

“Betterment loan”
means a loan to be provided by private lenders either directly or through a state agency, authority or instrumentality or a locality or local or regional authority serving as a conduit lender, to repair, replace, or upgrade an onsite sewage system or an alternative discharging sewage system for the purpose of reducing threats to public health and ground and surface waters, which loan is secured by a lien with a priority equivalent to the priority of a lien securing an assessment for local improvements under §

15.2-2411

.

“Conduit lender”
means a state agency, authority or instrumentality or a locality, local or regional authority or an instrumentality thereof serving as a conduit lender of betterment loans.

“Conventional onsite sewage system”
means a treatment works consisting of one or more septic tanks with gravity, pumped, or siphoned conveyance to a gravity distributed subsurface drainfield.

“Licensed onsite soil evaluator”
means a person who is licensed under Chapter 23 (§ 54.1-2300 et seq.) of Title 54.1 as an onsite soil evaluator. A licensed onsite soil evaluator is authorized to evaluate soils and soil properties in relationship to the effects of these properties on the use and management of these soils as the locations for onsite sewage systems.

“Maintenance”
means, unless otherwise provided in local ordinance, (i) performing adjustments to equipment and controls or (ii) in-kind replacement of normal wear and tear parts that do not require a construction permit for adjustment or replacement of the component such as light bulbs, fuses, filters, pumps, motors, sewer lines, conveyance lines, distribution boxes, header lines, or other like components. “Maintenance” includes pumping the tanks or cleaning the building sewer on a periodic basis. Notwithstanding any local ordinance, “maintenance” does not include replacement of tanks, drainfield piping, subsurface drainfields, or work requiring a construction permit and installer. Unless otherwise prohibited by local ordinance, a conventional onsite sewage system installer or an alternative onsite sewage system installer may perform maintenance work limited to in-kind replacement of light bulbs, fuses, filters, pumps, sewer lines, conveyance lines, distribution boxes, and header lines.

“Operate”
means the act of making a decision on one’s own volition (i) to place into or take out of service a unit process or unit processes or (ii) to make or cause adjustments in the operation of a unit process at a treatment works.

“Operation”
means the biological, chemical, and mechanical processes of transforming sewage or wastewater to compounds or elements and water that no longer possess an adverse environmental or health impact.

“Operator”
means any individual employed or contracted by any owner, who is licensed or certified under Chapter 23 (§ 54.1-2300 et seq.) of Title 54.1 as being qualified to operate, monitor, and maintain an alternative onsite sewage system.

“Owner”
means the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, including sanitary districts, sanitation district commissions and authorities, any individual, any group of individuals acting individually or as a group, or any public or private institution, corporation, company, partnership, firm or association which owns or proposes to own a sewerage system or treatment works.

“Regulations”
means the Sewage Handling and Disposal Regulations, heretofore or hereafter enacted or adopted by the State Board of Health.

“Review Board”
means the State Sewage Handling and Disposal Appeals Review Board.

“Sewage”
means water-carried and non-water-carried human excrement, kitchen, laundry, shower, bath or lavatory wastes, separately or together with such underground, surface, storm and other water and liquid industrial wastes as may be present from residences, buildings, vehicles, industrial establishments or other places.

“Sewerage system”
means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations and force mains and all other construction, devices and appliances appurtenant thereto, used for the collection and conveyance of sewage to a treatment works or point of ultimate disposal.

“Subsurface drainfield”
means a system installed within the soil and designed to accommodate treated sewage from a treatment works.

“Transportation”
means the vehicular conveyance of sewage.

“Treatment works”
means any device or system used in the storage, treatment, disposal or reclamation of sewage or combinations of sewage and industrial wastes, including but not limited to pumping, power and other equipment and appurtenances, septic tanks, and any works, including land, that are or will be (i) an integral part of the treatment process or (ii) used for ultimate disposal of residues or effluents resulting from such treatment.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-9; 1954, c. 646; 1964, c. 436; 1970, c. 645; 1972, c. 775; 1979, c. 711; 1984, c. 457; 1990, cc. 342, 861, 869; 1994, c. 747; 2007, cc. 892, 924; 2009, c. 829; 2018, c. 830.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 302 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $425.00, for a construction permit for on-site sewage systems designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day, and alternative discharging systems not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“2. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $350.00, for the certification letter for less than 1,000 gallons per day not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“3. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $225.00, for a construction permit for an onsite sewage system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day when the application is supported with certified work from a licensed onsite soil evaluator.

“4. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $320.00, for the certification letter for less than 1,000 gallons per day supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator.

“5. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $300.00, for a construction permit for a private well.

“6. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of no more than $1,400.00, for a construction permit or certification letter designed for more than 1,000 gallons per day.

“7. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $425.00, for a permit to repair an onsite sewage system or an alternative discharging system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day not supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer working in consultation with an onsite soil evaluator. This fee shall be waived for persons with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines as established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services when the application is for a pit privy or for a repair of a failing onsite or alternative discharging sewage system.

“8. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $225.00, for a permit to repair or voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system or alternative discharging system designed for less than 1,000 gallons per day supported with certified work from an onsite soil evaluator or a professional engineer. This fee shall be waived for persons with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines as established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services when the application is for a pit privy or for a repair of a failing onsite or alternative discharging sewage system.

“9. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $150.00, to provide written authorizations pursuant to §

32.1-165

not supported with certified work from a qualified professional.

“10. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $100.00, to provide written authorizations pursuant to §

32.1-165

supported with certified work from a qualified professional.

“11. Notwithstanding §

32.1-163

through §

32.1-176

, Code of Virginia, and starting July 1, 2019, the State Health Commissioner shall charge a fee of $1,400.00, for a permit to repair or voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system designed for more than 1,000 gallons per day.

“12. The State Health Commissioner shall appoint two manufacturers to the Advisory Committee on Sewage Handling and Disposal, representing one system installer and the Association of Onsite Soil Engineers.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 892 and 924, effective July 1, 2009, inserted the definitions of “Alternative onsite sewage system,” “Conventional onsite sewage system,” “Licensed onsite soil evaluator”; deleted the definition of “Authorized onsite soil evaluator,” which read: “ ‘Authorized onsite soil evaluator’ means a person possessing the qualifications specified by the Board who has successfully completed the course and testing to be authorized to evaluate soils and soil properties in relationship to the effects of these properties on the use and management of these soils as the locations for traditional onsite sewage disposal systems.” Acts 2007, c. 892 additionally inserted the definitions for “Maintenance,” “Operate,” “Operation,” and “Operator.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 829 added the definitions of “Betterment loan” and “Conduit lender.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 830 rewrote the definition for “Maintenance.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

§ 32.1-163.1.
Personal liability of sanitarians defined.

A sanitarian while acting within the scope of his employment in approving or denying applications for permits for onsite sewage disposal systems or while performing checks of or reviewing and approving field evaluations completed by licensed onsite soil evaluators shall be subject to personal liability only for his gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

History.

1986, c. 331; 1994, c. 747; 2016, c. 90.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 90 substituted “licensed onsite soil evaluators” for “authorized onsite soil evaluators.”

§ 32.1-163.2.
Long range plan for onsite sewage.

In addition to the powers and duties provided in §

32.1-164

, the Board of Health shall develop and revise as may be necessary a five-year plan for the handling and disposal of onsite sewage. Such plan shall include (i) the number of applications for onsite sewage permits per year; (ii) the number of households or facilities utilizing onsite sewage systems per year; (iii) the volume of onsite sewage to be disposed per year; (iv) the available and needed capacity in the Commonwealth for environmentally sound methods of disposal of septage in sewage treatment plants, other approved facilities and by land application per year; (v) descriptions of technology for alternative systems including the types of soils and conditions recommended as appropriate for such alternative systems; and (vi) recommendations for changes in the laws or regulations pertaining to onsite sewage and the system of permitting onsite sewage systems. The Board shall also report every five years to the governor and the General Assembly, beginning in 1992, on the status of onsite sewage handling and disposal in Virginia and the progress in implementing its long range plan.

History.

1987, c. 223.

Cross references.

As to notification to the Board of Health concerning capability of new or expanded sewage treatment plants, see §

15.2-2123

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 476, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall evaluate the need for 180-day biochemical oxygen demand sampling of small alternative onsite sewage systems that serve no more than three attached or detached single-family residences with a combined average flow of less than or equal to 1,000 gallons per day of residential strength sewage, or a structure with an average daily sewage flow of less than or equal to 1,000 gallons per day of residential strength sewage, and shall report its findings to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by December 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, c. 602, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Health shall take steps to begin eliminating site evaluation and design services for onsite sewage systems and private wells provided by the Department. In doing so, the Department shall:

“1. Require, in cases in which site evaluations and design services for onsite sewage systems and private wells are provided by private sector service providers, that such site evaluation and design service providers disclose to the property owner when a conventional onsite sewage system is an option;

“2. Revise agency regulations and policies to require Department staff to inspect all onsite sewage systems and private wells designed by private sector service providers;

“3. Expand efforts to educate the public concerning the design, operation, and maintenance of onsite sewage systems and private wells;

“4. Expand efforts to incorporate onsite sewage systems and private well data into community health assessments;

“5. Enhance quality assurance checks and inspection procedures for the review of evaluations, designs, and installations by private sector service providers and update its quality assurance manual to reflect this change in the agency’s business model;

“6. Consider separating work unit functions regarding permitting and enforcement for onsite sewage systems and private wells to ensure that staff reviewing evaluations and designs for permitting purposes are separate and independent from staff performing enforcement functions;

“7. Improve the collection and management of data about onsite sewage systems and private wells, including (i) creating a web-based reporting system for conventional onsite sewage system operation and maintenance, (ii) accepting applications and payments online, (iii) making onsite sewage system and private well records available online, (iv) creating a complete electronic record of all permitted onsite sewage systems and private wells in the Commonwealth, and (v) creating procedures for tracking Notices of Alleged Violations and corrective actions; and

“8. Revise agency policies to allow the transfer of valid construction permits for onsite sewage systems and private wells to new property owners.”

Acts 2017, c. 602, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health shall report on its progress in implementing the provisions of this act and any recommendations for statutory, regulatory, policy or budgetary changes that may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act to the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 1, 2017.”

§ 32.1-163.3.
Identities of persons making certain reports to remain confidential.

The identity of any person making a report of an alleged violation of any provision of this article or any regulation of the Board of Health relating to sewage disposal shall be confidential.
However, the identity of such person may be disclosed (i) to the Commissioner, the members of the Board and personnel of the Department in the performance of their duties; (ii) when the identity is included in materials which are the subject of a request for information pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, Chapter 37 (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) of Title 2.2; (iii) when the matter reported is the subject of a hearing conducted by the State Health Department Sewage Handling and Disposal Appeal Review Board; or (iv) when the matter reported is the subject of litigation.

History.

1990, c. 468.

§ 32.1-163.4.
Procedures for application backlogs; individuals approved to conduct evaluations for septic system or other onsite sewage system permit applications.

In any case where the local or district health department experiences a septic system or other onsite sewage system permit backlog of 15 working days from the application filing date, the Commissioner shall contract with licensed onsite soil evaluators for the field evaluation of the backlogged application sites. The Department shall review these evaluations and may approve the permit applications upon finding that the evaluations are in compliance with the Board’s regulations implementing this chapter. The Department shall not be required to do a field check of the evaluation prior to issuing the permit; however, the Department may conduct such field analyses as deemed necessary to protect the integrity of the Commonwealth’s environment.

The Board, Commissioner, and Department of Health shall accept private evaluations for septic system or other onsite sewage system permit applications only from licensed onsite soil evaluators.

The Board’s regulations shall include a definition of backlog providing a set number or a percent of the received applications.

History.

1994, c. 747; 2016, c. 90.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 90, in subsection A, substituted “15” for “fifteen,” and “licensed onsite soil evaluators” for “authorized onsite soil evaluators”; and in subsection B, substituted “licensed onsite soil evaluators” for “authorized onsite soil evaluators.”

§ 32.1-163.5.
Onsite sewage evaluations.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, for purposes of subdivision review, permit approval, and issuance of letters for residential development, the Board, Commissioner, and Department of Health shall accept private site evaluations and designs, in compliance with the Board’s regulations for septic systems and other onsite sewage systems, designed and certified by a licensed professional engineer, in consultation with a licensed onsite soil evaluator, or by a licensed onsite soil evaluator. The evaluations and designs included within such submissions shall be certified as complying with the Board’s regulations implementing this chapter.

The Department shall not be required to perform a field check of private evaluations and designs prior to issuing the requested letter, permit or approval; however, the Department may conduct such review of the work and field analysis as deemed necessary to protect the public health and integrity of the Commonwealth’s environment. Within 15 working days from the date of written submission of a request for approval of a site evaluation and design for a single lot construction permit, and within 60 days from the date of written submission of a request for approval of a site evaluation and design for multiple lot certification letters or subdivision review, the Department shall (i) issue the requested letter, permit or approval or (ii) set forth in writing the specific reasons for denial. If the Department fails to take action to approve or disapprove the designs, evaluations, or subdivision reviews within the time specified herein, the designs, evaluations or subdivision reviews shall be deemed approved and the appropriate letter, permit or approval shall be issued. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the provisions of any local ordinance, counties, cities and towns shall comply with the time limits set forth in this subsection.

Nothing in this section shall authorize anyone other than an individual licensed as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 4 (§ 54.1-400 et seq.) of Title 54.1 to engage in the practice of engineering.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any locality that has entered into a contract with the Board of Health in accordance with Chapter 678 of the 1994 Acts of Assembly nor to a proprietary, pre-engineered septic system deemed by the Department to comply with the Board’s regulations.

History.

1999, c. 1038; 2001, c. 337; 2016, c. 90.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 337 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 90, in subsection A, substituted “onsite sewage systems” for “on-site sewage systems,” “licensed onsite soil evaluator” for “authorized on-site soil evaluator,” and “a licensed onsite soil evaluator” for “an authorized on-site soil evaluator”; and in subsection B, substituted “15” for “fifteen,” and “60” for “sixty.”

§ 32.1-163.6.
Professional engineering of onsite treatment works.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, for purposes of permit approval, the Board, Commissioner, and Department of Health shall accept treatment works designs from individuals licensed as professional engineers pursuant to Chapter 4 (§ 54.1-400 et seq.) of Title 54.1. The designs shall (i) be compliant with standard engineering practice and performance requirements established by the Board and those horizontal setback requirements necessary to protect the public health and the environment, (ii) reflect that degree of skill and care ordinarily exercised by licensed members of the engineering profession practicing at the time of performance, (iii) be appropriate for the particular soil characteristics of the site, and (iv) ensure that the treatment works will meet or exceed the discharge, effluent, and surface and ground water quality standards for systems otherwise permitted pursuant to the regulations implementing this chapter.

The Department may conduct such review of the work and field analysis as deemed necessary to protect the public health and integrity of the Commonwealth’s environment.

Within 21 calendar days from the date of application for treatment works sized at 1,000 gallons per day or smaller, and within 60 calendar days from the date of application for treatment works sized at more than 1,000 gallons per day, the Department shall (i) issue the requested approval, or (ii) set forth in writing the specific reasons for denial.

The Department shall establish an engineering design review panel to review the Department’s decision to disapprove an onsite sewage system design. The Commissioner shall appoint four individuals licensed as professional engineers pursuant to Chapter 4 (§ 54.1-400 et seq.) of Title 54.1 with expertise in onsite sewage systems to serve on the engineering design review panel with (i) one representing the Department of Health, (ii) one representing the Department of Environmental Quality, (iii) one representing the Virginia Society of Professional Engineers, and (iv) one representing the American Council of Engineering Companies of Virginia. If a state agency is unable to provide a representative in accordance with this subsection, the Commissioner shall appoint another individual licensed as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 4 (§ 54.1-400 et seq.) of Title 54.1 with expertise in onsite sewage systems. The members of the design review panel shall appoint a member to serve as Chairman. The design review panel shall be designated a subordinate, as defined in §

2.2-4001

, and shall meet as necessary.

When the Department denies an application pursuant to subsection D, the owner may appeal that decision in accordance with §

32.1-164.1

. Alternatively, the owner, or the professional engineer responsible for an onsite sewage system design with the owner’s written consent, may request an informal fact-finding conference before the engineering design review panel established in subsection D. The request must (i) be in writing, (ii) be received by the Commissioner within 30 days of the professional engineer’s receipt of the Department’s denial, and (iii) cite the reason or reasons for the request. The informal fact-finding conference shall be held within 45 calendar days of the request. The proceedings of the engineering design review panel shall be governed by the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Within 30 days following its receipt of the engineering review panel’s written recommendations, the Department shall consider the recommendations of the engineering design review panel and approve the application or re-affirm its denial.

When the Department denies an application following review by the engineering design review panel, the owner may appeal that decision in accordance with §

32.1-164.1

.

This section shall not be construed to require an owner to seek review by the engineering design review panel before appealing a permit denial pursuant to §

32.1-164.1

.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit any locality from adopting or enforcing any ordinance duly enacted pursuant to Chapter 21 (§

15.2-2100

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

All treatment works designs permitted pursuant to this section shall comply with operation, maintenance, and monitoring requirements as set forth in regulations implementing this chapter.

History.

2008, c. 515; 2009, cc. 97, 220, 296.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, clause (iii) of subsection A, as added by Acts 2009, cc. 220 and 296, was redesignated as clause (iv) of subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 97, in the last sentence of subsection A, added clause (iii) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 220 and 296 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, added clause (iv) at the end in the last sentence and made related changes; and added subsection I. In clause (iv), c. 220 includes “effluence, and surface and ground water quality.” In c. 296, “subsection D” is substituted for “subsection C.” The section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Compliance with statute. —

Circuit court declined to sustain a demurrer by a health department because the writ of mandamus that the permit applicant sought depended upon the health department having acted in its discretion when it determined that it had no jurisdiction. The court wanted to hear the testimony of professional engineers on the issue in that the statutory language lent itself to the interpretation that the health department had to follow the provisions of the statute in considering whether to issue or deny a permit. Fisher v. Westmoreland Cty. Health Dep't, 104 Va. Cir. 411, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 313 (Amelia County Oct. 31, 2011).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Emergency regulations. —

Adoption by the Board of Health of the emergency regulations required by the enactment language of the 2009 amendments to §

32.1-163.6

will trigger the applicability of subsections C and D of §

15.2-2157

upon the effective date of such regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Edward T. Scott, Member, House of Delegates, 09-062, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 46 (11/9/09).

Requirements for installing alternative onsite sewage system. —

A Virginia locality may not require an owner to obtain a special exception to a local zoning ordinance in order to install an alternative onsite sewage system where the conditions set forth in subsection C of §

15.2-2157

are met, including that (1) there is no sewer or sewerage disposal facility available; and (2) the alternative onsite sewage system has been approved by the Virginia Department of Health for use in the particular circumstances and conditions in which the proposed system is to be operating. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen H. Martin, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-061, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 79 (12/03/10).

A Virginia locality cannot adopt requirements and standards for alternative onsite sewage systems that are in addition to or more stringent than those enacted by the Board of Health and administered through the Virginia Department of Health when the conditions set forth in subsection C of §

15.2-2157

exist, namely that (i) there is no sewer or sewerage disposal facility available and (ii) the alternative onsite sewage system has been approved by the Virginia Department of Health for use in the particular circumstances and conditions in which the proposed system is to be operating. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen H. Martin, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-045, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (11/9/2012).